morph_analyzers/TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc
LEXICON datPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:datC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        datPostPKi;

LEXICON datPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:datC%>:@RB    datPostPKiCont;

LEXICON datPostPKiCont
                            AdvCont;
                            Ki;
                            PostPTimeCont;

LEXICON PostPTimeCont
                            D_dir;
                            D_lArI;
                            D_lIGInA;
                            CliticSA;

!
! ablative complement
!

LEXICON ablPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:ablC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        ablPostP;

LEXICON ablPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON ablPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:ablC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        ablPostPKi;


LEXICON ablPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>:@RB    AdvCont;
%<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>:@RB    Ki;
%<Postp%:adv%:ablC%>:@RB    PostPTimeCont;

!
! instrumetnal/commutative complement
!

LEXICON insPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:insC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        insPostP;

LEXICON insPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:insC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON insPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:insC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
%<Postp%:adj%:insC%>:@RB    Ki;

!
! these require a complement with either -lI or -sIz
!

LEXICON liPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:liC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        liPostP;

LEXICON liPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:liC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON liPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:liC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        liPostPKi;

LEXICON liPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:liC%>:@RB    AdvCont;
%<Postp%:adv%:liC%>:@RB    Ki;

!
! these requrire a cardinal number as complement
!

LEXICON numPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:numC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        numPostP;

LEXICON numPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:numC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON numPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:numC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        numPostPKi;

LEXICON numPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:numC%>:@RB    AdvCont;
%<Postp%:adv%:numC%>:@RB    Ki;

!
! The follwing makes complex postpositons.
!

LEXICON PostPlocation
                PostPloc;
                PostPdat;
                PostPabl;

LEXICON PostPloc
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPlocCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPlocCont;

LEXICON PostPlocCont
%<loc%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^D^A@MB     DerivedPostpCont;
%<loc%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^D^A@MB     Ki;

LEXICON PostPdat
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPdatCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPdatCont;

LEXICON PostPdatCont
%<dat%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^(y)^A@MB   DerivedPostpCont;

LEXICON PostPins
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPinsCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPinsCont;

LEXICON PostPinsCont
%<ins%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^(y)l^NS^A@MB  DerivedPostpCont;

LEXICON PostPabl
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPablCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPablCont;

LEXICON PostPablCont
%<abl%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^D^An@MB    DerivedPostpCont;

LEXICON PostPca
%<N%>%<p1s%>:@RB^(I)m@MB      PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p2s%>:@RB^(I)n@MB      PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:@RB^(s)^I@MB     PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:@RB^(I)m^Iz@MB   PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:@RB^(I)n^Iz@MB   PostPcaCont;
%<N%>%<p3p%>:@RBl^Ar^I@MB     PostPcaCont;

LEXICON PostPcaCont
%<ca%>%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:^C^A@MB       DerivedPostpCont;

LEXICON DerivedPostpCont
                                         AdvCont;
                                         NomPredicate;

!
! Possessive suffixes after adjectives and determiners make pronouns.
!
! TODO: The semantic difference between these are generally difficult
!       to get:
!
!       yeni<Adj><p3s><Prn>  `(a) new one'
!       yeni<Adj><0><N><p3s> `his/her new one = the new thing that he/she owns'
!       
!       And becomes more obscure in cases like this:
!
!       mavi<Adj><p2s><Prn>    `the thing that is a blue version of you'
!       mavi<Adj><0><N><p2s>   `the blue thing that you own'
!

LEXICON JP_poss
            JP_plu;
            JP_possessive;

LEXICON JP_plu
%<pl%>:l^Ar@MB              JP_possessive12p;

LEXICON     JP_possessive12p
%<p1p%>%<Prn%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB   NposCont;
%<p2p%>%<Prn%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB   NposCont;

LEXICON     JP_possessive
%<p1s%>%<Prn%>:^(I)m@MB      NposCont;
%<p2s%>%<Prn%>:^(I)n@MB      NposCont;
%<p3s%>%<Prn%>:^(s)^I@MB     NposCont;
%<p3p%>%<Prn%>:l^Ar^I@MB     NposCont;
                             JP_possessive12p;

! besides adjectivals, the adverb `hep' also makes pronominals
! the same way. Instead of <p3s> version `hepi', the correct 
! form is `hepsi'. We allow `hepi', too, as it is used colloquially.
!
! The 1p and 2p singular forms are probably not possible.
! We allow them here.
!
LEXICON HepPrn
%<Adv%>%<p3s%>%<Prn%>:s^I@MB       NposCont;
%<Adv%>%<p3s%>%<Prn%>:^(s)^I@MB    NposCont;
%<Adv%>%<p1p%>%<Prn%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB  NposCont;
%<Adv%>%<p2p%>%<Prn%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB  NposCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:s^I@MB         NposCont;
%<N%>%<p3s%>:^(s)^I@MB      NposCont;
%<N%>%<p1p%>:^(I)m^Iz@MB    NposCont;
%<N%>%<p2p%>:^(I)n^Iz@MB    NposCont;

!
! onomatopoeic words
!
LEXICON Onom
%<Onom%>:@RB        OnomCont;

%<Onom%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    OnomCont;


LEXICON  OnomCont
                    ENDLEX;
                    Oderiv; ! TODO: this may be overgenerating

!
! interjections
!
! these do not have to be separate lexicons, but it makes things
! easier with old lexicon conversion.

LEXICON Interjection
%<Ij%>:@RB      InterjectionCont;

%<Ij%:mredup%>:@MREDUP@RB    InterjectionCont;


LEXICON InterjectionCont
                  ENDLEX;
                  D_lA;


!
! This part handles the (nominal) suffixes following the quotation
! marks. This happens when a word, or even a complete sentence is put
! in quotation marks, and inflected as if it is a noun.
!   Examples:
!       ``Manisa  dosyası''nı
!       ``Çeşitli Kanunlarda Değişiklik Yapılmasına İlişkin Kanun''u
!
! TODO: the first example above does not work correctly (due to y -> n
!       alternation after -sI
!

LEXICON Root
afedersiniz       Interjection;
akıllı            Interjection;
aman% Allahım     Interjection;
ayol              Interjection;
bili% bili        Interjection;
çer% çöp          Interjection;
dehşet            Interjection;
efendim           Interjection;
fˈertik            Interjection;
hadii             Interjection;
haydi             Interjection;
hele% hele        Interjection;
hoop              Interjection;
iki% gözüm        Interjection;
iyilik% güzellik  Interjection;
kız               Interjection;
lˈava              Interjection;
mübarek           Interjection;
oğul              Interjection;
ooo               Interjection;
pöh               Interjection;
taa               Interjection;
tüh               Interjection;
valla             Interjection;
yarabbi           Interjection;
yuf               Interjection;
0%:-) Interjection ;
XD Interjection ;
tıpış                           Onom;
fos                             Onom;
tık                             Onom;
şır                             Onom;
ıh                              Onom;
bırrr                           Onom;
börb                            Onom;
brrr                            Onom;
çat                             Onom;
cik                             Onom; !from CHILDES
cırr                            Onom;
çut                             Onom;
düüt                            Onom;
fış                             Onom;
fyyyy                           Onom; !from CHILDES
hapur                           Onom; !from CHILDES
hııhıı                          Onom;
hüp                             Onom; !from CHILDES
lap                             Onom;
me                              Onom;
mö                              Onom;
pır                             Onom;
şakır                           Onom;
şşşt                            Onom;
ühü                             Onom;
vırın                           Onom;
zırt                            Onom;
cumburlop                       Onom;
doğru                           datPostPKi;
kadar                           datPostPKi;
dek                             datPostPKi;
karşı                           datPostPKi;
başka                           ablPostP;
gayrı                           ablPostP;
beri                            ablPostPKi;
bu% yana                        ablPostP;
dolayı                          ablPostP;
itibaren                        ablPostPKi;
ˈönce                            ablPostPKi;
evvel                           ablPostPKi;
sˈonra                           ablPostPKi;
yana                            ablPostP;
ço^k                            ablPostP;      !as in 'benden çok' not in G&K
az                              ablPostP;      !as in 'benden çok' not in G&K
dahi                            ablPostP;
fazla                           ablPostP;
öte                             ablPostPadjKi; ! adj: 'komediden öte bir karar'
ötürü                           ablPostP;
yukarı                          ablPostPKi;
aşağı                           ablPostPKi;
içeri                           ablPostP;
dışarı                          ablPostP;
beraber                         insPostP; ! Not in G&K
birlikte                        insPostP;
ilgili                          insPostP; ! Not in G&K
halde                           liPostP;    
kere                            numPostP;  ! TODO: is this a noun???
kez                             numPostP;  ! TODO: is this a noun???
defa                            numPostP;  ! TODO: is this a noun???
ön                      PostPlocation;
arka                    PostPlocation;
iç                      PostPlocation;
içeri                   PostPlocation;
dış                     PostPlocation;
hari^c                  PostPlocation;
üst                     PostPlocation;
alt                     PostPlocation;
yan                     PostPlocation;
karşı                   PostPlocation;
ara                     PostPlocation;
etraf                   PostPlocation;
çevre                   PostPlocation;
öte                     PostPlocation;
kenar                   PostPlocation;
dışarı                  PostPlocation;
ar^t                    PostPlocation;
son                     PostPlocation;
u^c                     PostPlocation;  ! not in G&K
açı                     PostPabl; ! açı-sın-dan 
yüz                     PostPabl; ! yüz-ün-den 
taraf                   PostPabl; ! taraf-ın-dan 
bakım                   PostPabl; ! bakım-ın-dan
aracılı^k               PostPins;! aracılığ-ı-yla 
itibar                  PostPins;! itibar-i-yla 
itib^pAr                PostPins;! itibar-i-yla 
vasıta                  PostPins;! vasita-si-yla
suret                   PostPins;! suret-si-yla -- not in G&K
neden                   PostPins;! neden-i-yle 
yol                     PostPins;! yol-u-yla 
ad                      PostPdat;! ad-ın-a 
uğu@DEL@r               PostPdat;! uğr-un-a
yer                     PostPdat;! yer-in-e 
saye                    PostPloc;! saye-sin-de
konu                    PostPloc;! konu-sun-da 
ha@DUP@k                PostPloc;! hakk-ın-da 
şeki@DEL@l              PostPloc;! şekl-in-de
sıra                    PostPloc;! sıra-sın-de 
biçim                   PostPloc;! biçim-in-de  -- this one can also 
gerek                   PostPca;! gereğ-in-ce 
süre                    PostPca;! süre-sin-ce 
boy                     PostPca;! boy-un-ca 
